Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 3. Coastal Area Bridges
[Repealed].

§§ 65-23-101 through 65-23-121.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2007, ch. 582, § 25, eff July 18, 2007 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the repeal of these sections).

§65-23-101. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 1.

§65-23-103. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 2.]

§65-23-105. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-03; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 3, ch. 396.]

§65-23-107. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 4.]

§65-23-109. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-05; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 5.]

§65-23-111. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 6.]

§65-23-113. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 7.

§65-23-115. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-08; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 8.]

§65-23-117. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-09; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 9.]

§65-23-119. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-10; Laws, 1950, ch. 406, § 10.]

§65-23-121. [Codes, 1942, § 8447-12; Laws, 1952, ch. 295.]